Hawaii, session 2026, HB1841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 189, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, established a condominium property regime task force to examine issues related to mediation, litigation, costs, legal remedies among condominium association stakeholders, respective authorities of association boards and unit owners, and the scope of governmental oversight. The legislature further finds that the final report of the condominium property regime task force, due to the legislature by June 30, 2026, is required to include any proposed changes to legislation. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to implement the condominium property regime task force's proposed changes to legislation. SECTION 2. The proposed changes of the condominium property require task force shall be implemented. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________